Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.160

Three-year occupancy—Condemnation avoids ouster.

No corporation which shall have been or shall be in possession of property put to public use for three or more years, and while continuing to put such property to public use shall be ousted therefrom or prevented from continuing such use if prior to the entry of any judgment of ouster it shall institute condemnation proceedings to acquire such property for public use, and shall thereafter prosecute the same in good faith and pay any compensation awarded therein.

[ 1927 c 219 s 2; RRS s 921-2.]